District of Columbia statutes.
10-801.01

“Real property” defined.

For the purposes of this subchapter, the term “real property” means land titled in the name of the District of Columbia (“District”) or in which the District has a controlling interest and includes all structures of a permanent character erected thereon or affixed thereto, any natural resources located thereon or thereunder, all riparian rights attached thereto, or any air space located above or below the property or any street or alley under the jurisdiction of the Mayor.

Aug. 5, 1939, 53 Stat. 1211, c. 449, § 1a
as added Mar. 15, 1990, D.C. Law 8-96, § 2, 37 DCR 795
Mar. 13, 2004, D.C. Law 15-105, § 53(a), 51 DCR 881
D.C. Law 15-105 validated a previously made technical correction.
1981 Ed., § 9-401.1.
This section is referenced in § 6-1451.01 and § 39-107a.